Illinois, session 104th, HB5408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Abortion Access Fund. 8    Section 10. The Department of Public Health Powers and 9Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 10amended by adding Section 2310-426 as follows: 11    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-426 new)12    Sec. 2310-426. Abortion Access Fund Grant Program.13    (a) As used in this Section:14    "Abortion" has the meaning given to that term in Section 151-10 of the Reproductive Health Act.16    "Fund" means the Abortion Access Fund.17    (b) The Department shall establish the Abortion Access 18Fund Grant Program. Subject to appropriation, the Program 19shall use moneys in the Fund to award grants to support access 20to abortions throughout the State. Grants awarded under the 21Program shall only be used to fund abortions for which the use   HB5408 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20688 BAB 34187 b1of federal funds is prohibited for patients who are uninsured 2or underinsured with respect to those services.3    (c) The Abortion Access Fund is created as a special fund 4in the State treasury. The Fund shall consist of moneys 5deposited into the Fund under Section 5-35 of the Illinois 6Health Benefits Exchange Law. 7    Section 15. The Illinois Health Benefits Exchange Law is 8amended by adding Section 5-35 as follows: 9    (215 ILCS 122/5-35 new)10    Sec. 5-35. Separate allocation account reports and 11transfers.12    (a) Beginning on or before March 1, 2027, and on or before 13March 1 of each year thereafter, a health insurance issuer 14described in subsection (b) or (c) that has offered one or more 15qualified health plans through the Illinois Health Benefits 16Exchange shall report to the Department of Insurance an 17accounting of receipts, disbursements, transfers of funds 18between accounts, total dollar claims paid, accrued interest, 19and the year-end balance each reporting year for the separate 20allocation accounts that the issuer has established under 42 21U.S.C. 18023(b)(2)(B) and 42 U.S.C. 18023(b)(2)(C) for 22abortion services for which federal funding is prohibited. If 23funds have been transferred from a separate allocation account 24described in this subsection to any other account maintained   HB5408 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20688 BAB 34187 b1by, on behalf of, or for the benefit of the health insurance 2issuer, the annual report shall attribute the amount of or 3amounts within the transfer to premiums collected by plan year 4under 42 U.S.C. 1303(B)(2)(B)(i)(II), except that the 5attribution shall not result in premiums collected being less 6than claims paid for services rendered during the plan year. 7The annual reports shall include any related documentation and 8shall adhere to any format as the Director of Insurance may 9prescribe.10    (b) For the report due on or before March 1, 2027, if a 11health insurance issuer has an active certificate of authority 12from the Director of Insurance on the reporting deadline, and 13if the issuer has offered a qualified health plan in this State 14through the Illinois Health Benefits Exchange at any time 15since plan year 2014, regardless of whether it was a 16Federally-facilitated Exchange, a State-based Exchange on the 17Federal platform, or a State-based Exchange, the issuer shall 18submit the report required under this Section for all 19qualified health plans offered through this Exchange. With 20respect to the separate allocation account described in 21subsection (a), the health insurance issuer shall report as 22prescribed by the Director of Insurance the balances and 23transactions during the periods:24        (1) January 1, 2014 through December 31, 2023;25        (2) January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2024;26        (3) January 1, 2025 through December 31, 2025;  HB5408 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20688 BAB 34187 b1        (4) January 1, 2026 through December 31, 2026; and2        (5) between December 31, 2026 and the date the report 3    is submitted, but only with respect to transfers from the 4    separate allocation account described in subsection (a) to 5    other accounts maintained by, on behalf of, or for the 6    benefit of the health insurance issuer.7    (c) For annual reports due on or before March 1, 2028 and 8on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, if a health 9insurance issuer has an active certificate of authority from 10the Director of Insurance on the reporting deadline, and if 11the issuer offered a qualified health plan through the 12Illinois Health Benefits Exchange during the preceding 13calendar year, the issuer shall submit the report required 14under this Section for that calendar year for all qualified 15health plans offered through this Exchange. For the period 16between the end of the calendar year and the date the report is 17submitted, the report shall also include any transfers from 18the separate allocation account described in subsection (a) to 19other accounts maintained by, on behalf of, or for the benefit 20of the health insurance issuer.21    (d) While 42 U.S.C. 1303(B)(2)(B)(i)(II) remains in 22effect, any premium funds collected by a health insurance 23issuer under that provision shall be used only to pay for 24abortions for which federal funding is prohibited, including 25through the remittances under subsection (e).26    (e) If after the 12-month period following the end of a   HB5408 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20688 BAB 34187 b1plan year the amount of premiums collected during the plan 2year for abortions for which federal funding is prohibited 3exceeds total claims paid for such services rendered during 4the plan year, the Director of Insurance shall order the 5health insurance issuer to remit funds, and the issuer shall 6complete the remittance to the Department of Insurance as 7follows:8        (1) on or before September 1, 2027, 90% of the amount 9    of the excess for each of the plan years 2014 through 2025, 10    plus interest accrued on the excess; and11        (2) on or before September 1, 2028, and on or before 12    September 1 of each year thereafter, 90% of the excess for 13    the second preceding plan year, plus interest accrued on 14    the excess.15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, on 16or before September 1, 2027 and on or before September 1 of 17each year thereafter, the health insurance issuer shall remit 18to the Department of Insurance all funds the health insurance 19issuer previously transferred from the separate allocation 20account described in subsection (a) to other accounts 21maintained by, on behalf of, or for the benefit of the health 22insurance issuer. Amounts transferred to other accounts 23maintained by, on behalf of, or for the benefit of the health 24insurance issuer shall count toward the excess in paragraph 25(1) or (2) of this subsection for the plan year for which the 26report attributed the transfer under subsection (a).  HB5408 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20688 BAB 34187 b1    (f) All moneys remitted to the Department of Insurance 2under this Section shall be deposited into the Abortion Access 3Fund.  4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.